Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-427
Stamps; nontransferable;
expiration.

The habitat stamp, aquatic habitat
stamp, or Nebraska migratory waterfowl stamp required by section 37-426 is
not transferable. The lifetime
habitat stamp, the lifetime aquatic habitat stamp, and the lifetime Nebraska migratory waterfowl
stamp do not expire. A multiple-year stamp expires
at midnight on December 31 in the last year for which the multiple-year stamp
is valid. A habitat stamp purchased for a permit which is valid
into the next calendar year expires when the permit expires. Any
other stamp expires at midnight on December 31 in the year for
which the stamp is issued.

Laws 1976, LB 861, § 8;

Laws 1983, LB 174, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 584, § 10;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-216.02;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 137;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 28;

Laws 2001, LB 111, § 7;

Laws 2003, LB 305, § 12;

Laws 2005, LB 162, § 9;

Laws 2007, LB299, § 5;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 10.